District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

46-303.07a

[Transferred].

Redesignated as § 46-303.08.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 307a
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(h), 45 DCR 2924
redesignated § 308, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(8), 53 DCR 3634